Missouri, session 2026, SB1333.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Missouri, as follows:
Section A. Chapters 451 and 452, RSMo, are amended by
adding thereto two new sections, to be known as sections 451.055
and 452.055, to read as follows:
451.055. 1. This section shall be known and may be
cited as the "Missouri Covenant Marriage Act".
2. Persons who have the legal capacity to marry under
this chapter may enter into a covenant marriage by declaring
their intent to do so on their application for a license
obtained under section 451.040 and by complying with the
requirements of this section. The returned marriage license
shall be designated a covenant marriage license and shall be
recorded as provided under this chapter, with an indication
that the marriage is a covenant marriage. The declaration
shall be filed with the recorder of deeds. Persons may
still obtain a standard marriage license, but such persons
shall have the option to obtain a covenant marriage
license. For all intents and purposes, the covenant
marriage license provision shall be considered equal to a
standard marriage license and recognized by all government

SB 1333 2
agencies, with all the benefits and rights of a standard
marriage license.
3. A declaration of intent to enter into a covenant
marriage shall contain all of the following:
(1) A written statement of the parties' intent to
enter into a covenant marriage that shall be in the
following form:
"DECLARATION OF INTENT TO ENTER INTO COVENANT MARRIAGE
A COVENANT MARRIAGE
We solemnly declare that we believe that marriage is a
covenant between one man and one woman who agree to live
together as husband and wife for as long as they both
live. We have chosen each other carefully and have
received premarital counseling on the nature, purposes,
and responsibilities of marriage. We understand that a
Covenant Marriage is for life and that we have received
counseling regarding the seriousness of Covenant
Marriage, including all the legal requirements of
individuals when entering into Covenant Marriage. If we
experience marital difficulties, we commit ourselves to
take all reasonable efforts to preserve our marriage,
including marital counseling.
With full knowledge of what this commitment means, we do
declare that our marriage will be bound by Missouri law
on Covenant Marriage and we promise to love, honor, and
care for one another as husband and wife for the rest of
our lives.
_________________________
Prospective Male Spouse
_________________________
Prospective Female Spouse";

SB 1333 3
(2) A notarized attestation declaring the following
and to be in the following form:
"AFFIDAVIT
BE IT KNOWN THAT the undersigned affiants acknowledge
that they have received at least eight hours of
premarital counseling from a priest, minister, pastor,
rabbi, any other clergy of any religious sect, or a
professional marriage counselor. The affiants have
received counseling regarding the seriousness of
Covenant Marriage, including all the legal requirements
of individuals when entering into Covenant Marriage;
communication of the fact that a Covenant Marriage is a
commitment for life; the obligation of a Covenant
Marriage is to take reasonable efforts to preserve the
marriage even if marital difficulties arise, including
the obligation to seek marital counseling in those
difficult times of marital conflict; and the limited
grounds for legally terminating a Covenant Marriage by
dissolution or legal separation.
STATE OF MISSOURI ____________)
COUNTY OF ____________________)
_________________________
Prospective Male Spouse
_________________________
Prospective Female Spouse
On this ______ day of ______ in the year ______ before
me, ______ (Name of Notary) Notary Public duly
commissioned and acting within and for the County and
State aforesaid, personally appeared ______ (Prospective
Male Spouse) and ______ (Prospective Female Spouse)
known to me to be the identical persons whose names are
affixed hereto, and who executed the Affidavit, and

SB 1333 4
acknowledged that they executed the same for the uses
and purposes therein contained and set forth.
(Seal)
My commission expires: _________________________
Notary Public _________________________";
(3) A notarized attestation that is signed by the
clergy or counselor and to be in the following form:
"ATTESTATION FOR COUNSELOR OR CLERGY
As a priest, minister, pastor, rabbi, any other clergy of
any religious sect, or a professional marriage counselor,
I attest that the prospective spouses seeking Covenant
Marriage received counseling from either me or a member
of my organization as to the nature and purpose of
Covenant Marriage that included all the legal
requirements of individuals when entering into Covenant
Marriage; communication of the fact that a Covenant
Marriage is a commitment for life; communication of the
fact that the obligation of a Covenant Marriage is to
take reasonable efforts to preserve the marriage even if
marital difficulties arise, including the obligation to
100 seek marital counseling in those difficult times of
101 marital conflict; and the limited grounds for legally
102 terminating a Covenant Marriage by dissolution or legal
103 separation.
104 _________________________
105 Counselor/Clergy
106 _________________________
107 Title (if applicable)
108 _________________________

SB 1333 5
109 Organization (if applicable)
110 AFFIDAVIT
111 BE IT KNOWN THAT the undersigned affiant acknowledges
112 that the prospective spouses seeking Covenant Marriage
113 have received at least eight hours of premarital
114 counseling from either a priest, minister, pastor, rabbi,
115 any other clergy of any religious sect, or a professional
116 marriage counselor. The counseling included a discussion
117 of the seriousness of Covenant Marriage, including all
118 the legal requirements of individuals when entering into
119 Covenant Marriage; communication of the fact that a
120 Covenant Marriage is a commitment for life; communication
121 of the fact that the obligation of a Covenant Marriage is
122 to take reasonable efforts to preserve the marriage even
123 if marital difficulties arise, including the obligation
124 to seek marital counseling in those difficult times of
125 marital conflict; and the limited grounds for legally
126 terminating a Covenant Marriage by dissolution or legal
127 separation.
128 STATE OF MISSOURI ____________)
129 COUNTY OF ____________________)
130 _________________________
131 Counselor/Clergy
132 On this ______ day of ______ in the year ______ before
133 me, ______ (Name of Notary) Notary Public duly
134 commissioned and acting within and for the County and
135 State aforesaid, personally appeared ______ (counselor,
136 priest, minister, pastor, rabbi, or other clergy) known
137 to me to be the identical person whose name is affixed
138 hereto, and who executed the Affidavit, and acknowledged
139 that they executed the same for the uses and purposes
140 therein contained and set forth.
141 (Seal)

SB 1333 6
142 My commission expires: _________________________
143 Notary Public _________________________"; and
144 (4) (a) If a husband and wife have previously
145 obtained a standard marriage license but would like to
146 convert the standard marriage license to a covenant marriage
147 license, a notarized attestation, to be in a form as
148 provided under paragraph (b) of this subdivision, of the
149 husband's and wife's intent to convert to a covenant
150 marriage shall be submitted to the recorder of deeds. A
151 husband and wife who apply for a covenant marriage
152 conversion under this subdivision shall not be required to
153 receive premarital counseling, and the husband and wife are
154 not required to have the converted covenant marriage
155 separately solemnized. The conversion of the standard
156 marriage to covenant marriage of a previously married couple
157 shall not require the attestations by clergy or counselors.
158 Conversion to a covenant marriage shall not make valid a
159 marriage that is prohibited under this chapter or that is
160 not validly contracted in this state.
161 (b) A notarized attestation of the intent to convert a
162 standard marriage license to a covenant marriage license
163 shall be in the following form:
164 "DECLARATION OF INTENT TO CONVERT TO COVENANT MARRIAGE
165 A COVENANT MARRIAGE
166 We solemnly declare that we believe that marriage is a
167 covenant between one man and one woman who agree to live
168 together as husband and wife for as long as they both
169 live. We understand that a Covenant Marriage is for
170 life and that we understand the seriousness of Covenant
171 Marriage, including all the legal requirements of

SB 1333 7
172 individuals when entering into Covenant Marriage. If we
173 experience marital difficulties, we commit ourselves to
174 take all reasonable efforts to preserve our marriage,
175 including marital counseling.
176 With full knowledge of what this commitment means, we do
177 declare that our marriage will be bound by Missouri law
178 on Covenant Marriage, and we promise to love, honor, and
179 care for one another as husband and wife for the rest of
180 our lives.
181 _________________________
182 Male Spouse
183 _________________________
184 Female Spouse
185 AFFIDAVIT
186 BE IT KNOWN THAT the undersigned affiants acknowledge
187 that they are requesting to convert their existing
188 marriage license to a Covenant Marriage license. The
189 affiants acknowledge and understand the seriousness of
190 Covenant Marriage, including all the legal requirements
191 of individuals when entering into Covenant Marriage; the
192 fact that a Covenant Marriage is a commitment for life;
193 the fact that the obligation of a Covenant Marriage is
194 to take reasonable efforts to preserve the marriage even
195 if marital difficulties arise, including the obligation
196 to seek marital counseling in those difficult times of
197 marital conflict; and the limited grounds for legally
198 terminating a Covenant Marriage by divorce or legal
199 separation.
200 STATE OF MISSOURI ____________)
201 COUNTY OF ____________________)
202 _________________________

SB 1333 8
203 Male Spouse
204 _________________________
205 Female Spouse
206 On this ______ day of ______ in the year ______ before
207 me, ______ (Name of Notary) Notary Public duly
208 commissioned and acting within and for the County and
209 State aforesaid, personally appeared ______ (Male
210 Spouse) and ______ (Female Spouse) known to me to be the
211 identical persons whose names are affixed hereto, and
212 who executed the Affidavit and acknowledged that they
213 executed the same for the uses and purposes therein
214 contained and set forth.
215 (Seal)
216 My commission expires: _________________________
217 Notary Public _________________________".
218 4. The recorder of deeds shall document that the
219 attestations were submitted and shall file all covenant
220 marriage license documentation according to the laws of the
221 state of Missouri. If all the provisions have been met
222 under this section, the recorder of deeds shall issue to the
223 husband and wife a marriage license certificate that
224 documents the husband's and wife's covenant marriage or
225 conversion to a covenant marriage accordingly.
226 5. The state of Missouri shall publish a page on its
227 website titled "Missouri Covenant Marriage Act". The page
228 shall describe the requirements for entering into a covenant
229 marriage under this section and the grounds necessary to
230 obtain a decree of dissolution of covenant marriage or a
231 legal separation of covenant marriage under section 452.055.

SB 1333 9
452.055. 1. A husband and wife who entered into a
covenant marriage under section 451.055 may file a petition
for legal separation of covenant marriage at any time, but a
petition for dissolution of covenant marriage shall be filed
only after the court has ordered a legal separation. The
court may enter temporary orders at any time after a
petition for legal separation of covenant marriage or a
petition for dissolution of covenant marriage has been filed
under this section.
2. Regardless of whether a husband and wife have
entered into a standard marriage or covenant marriage, if
there is a court-ordered requirement that divorcing or
separating parents with at least one minor child are
required to attend a parenting education class, the parties
may opt for a faith-based alternative program as long as
that program informs the parties of the effects of divorce
on families and children.
3. If a husband and wife have entered into a covenant
marriage under section 451.055, the court shall require that
both parties attend at least forty hours of marital
counseling before a dissolution may be granted. Counseling
may be provided by either a faith-based organization or a
professional marriage counselor or agency thereof.
4. If a husband and wife have entered into a covenant
marriage under section 451.055, the court shall not enter a
decree of dissolution until at least two years have passed
after the initial filing for legal separation or
dissolution, and the court shall grant a dissolution for
divorce only after first ordering a legal separation,
including any temporary orders deemed necessary by the court
for the following situations:
(1) Either spouse has committed adultery;

SB 1333 10
(2) Either spouse has habitually abused drugs or
alcohol;
(3) Either spouse has committed a felony and has been
sentenced to death or imprisonment in any federal, state,
county, or municipal correctional facility;
(4) Either spouse has physically or sexually abused
the other spouse, a child, a relative of either spouse
permanently living in the matrimonial domicile, or has
committed domestic violence or severe emotional abuse;
(5) Either spouse has abandoned the matrimonial
domicile and has not been in contact with the other spouse
for at least two years and that spouse refuses to return. A
party may file a petition based on this ground by alleging
that his or her spouse has abandoned the matrimonial
domicile and is expected to remain absent for the required
period of at least two years. If his or her spouse has not
abandoned the matrimonial domicile for the required period
of two years at the time of the filing of the petition, the
action of a dissolution of marriage shall be stayed for the
period of time remaining to meet the grounds based on
abandonment; except that, the court may enter and enforce
temporary orders of a legal separation during the time that
the action is pending;
(6) The spouses have been living separate and apart
continuously without reconciliation for at least two years.
A party may file a petition based on this ground by alleging
that it is expected that the parties have been living
separate and apart for the required period of at least two
years. If the parties have not been separated continuously
for the required period of at least two years at the time of
the filing of the petition, the action of dissolution of
marriage shall be stayed until the requirement of living

SB 1333 11
apart and separate continuously for at least two years is
met; except that, the court may enter and enforce temporary
orders for a legal separation during the time that the
action is pending; or
(7) The husband and wife have attended at least forty
hours of marital counseling sessions over the course of at
least two years.
5. Dissolution under this section shall be granted
after all other remedies under this section have failed.
✓